New York, session 2025-2026, A5744.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 659 of the labor law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any new 4 wage order or regulation or revision of an existing wage order or regu- 5 lation issued or adopted by the commissioner on or after January first, 6 two thousand twenty-six shall not be valid if such wage order or regu- 7 lation would have the effect of requiring an employer to pay an employee 8 for time not actually worked. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00155-01-5